New Jersey, session 221, A3081.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this act: "Digital photograph" means a certified color image of a particular law enforcement officer's face which can be verified and authenticated by electronic means. "Law enforcement officer" means any person who is employed as a permanent full-time member of any State, county, or municipal law enforcement agency, department, or division of those governments who is statutorily empowered to act for the detection, investigation, arrest, conviction, detention, or rehabilitation of persons violating the criminal laws of this State and statutorily required to successfully complete a training course approved by, or certified as being substantially equivalent to such an approved course, by the Police Training Commission pursuant to P.L.1961, c.56 (C.52:17B-66 et seq.). b.    A digital photograph of a law enforcement officer shall be taken every eight years.  The digital photograph shall be included in the personnel file of the law enforcement officer and on the officers identification card, if photographic identification is required by the officers agency, department, or division. c.     The Attorney General, in consultation with the Superintendent of State Police, shall establish guidelines to effectuate the purposes of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.